Utah statutes.
78B-6-1204.   Lis pendens required.
(1)  The plaintiff shall file a notice of the action with the recorders of all
the counties in which the property is situated.  The notice shall contain:
(a)  a copy of such complaint; or
(b)  a notice of the pendency of the action, containing:
(i)  the names of all known parties;
(ii)  the object of the action; and
(iii)  a description of the property affected.
(2)  Once the notice is filed, all persons having an interest in the property
shall be considered to have notice of the pendency of the action.
